Wyoming, session 2025, SF0186.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 22
ADVANCED NUCLEAR REACTOR MANUFACTURER FUEL STORAGE

35-11-2201. Definitions.
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Advanced nuclear reactor manufacturer"
means a person that is physically located in Wyoming and
that manufactures and deploys advanced nuclear reactors at
and from the manufacturer's location in Wyoming and that
refurbishes and refuels those reactors at the Wyoming
manufacturing location;

(ii) "Dry cask storage" means the storage of
spent nuclear fuel that has been cooled utilizing
containers, including any components and systems associated
with the containers, that use a realistic security, seismic
and flooding design basis for the storage of spent nuclear
fuel;

(iii) "Installation" means a facility for the
storage of spent nuclear fuel owned or operated by an
advanced nuclear reactor manufacturer;

(iv) "Spent nuclear fuel" means as defined in
the federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982, as amended.
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743

35-11-2202. Advanced nuclear reactor manufacturers;
storage of spent nuclear fuel.

(a) Any person undertaking the siting of an
installation shall do so in accordance with this article.

(b) Any person undertaking the siting of any
installation governed by this article shall submit an
application to the department before commencing
construction of the installation. The application shall
include:

(i) A copy of any application and other
materials submitted to the United States nuclear regulatory
commission;

(ii) A copy of any license granted to the
applicant for the installation from the United States
nuclear regulatory commission;

(iii) An acknowledgment in writing that the
installation will be temporary and will use dry cask
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
storage for the storage of only spent nuclear fuel that was
used in a reactor manufactured by an advanced nuclear
reactor manufacturer;

(iv) To the extent that the following
information is not submitted to the department under
paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection, the following
information:

(A) The criteria upon which the proposed
installation site was chosen, and information showing how
the site meets the criteria of the nuclear regulatory
commission and the department;

(B) The technical feasibility of the
proposed storage equipment and technology;

(C) The environmental, social and economic
impact of the installation in the area of study;

(D) Conformance with the federal guidelines
for an installation.

SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
(c) Upon receiving an application and the information
required under subsection (b) of this section, the
department, through the director, shall review the
application. If the application is complete and technically
adequate, the director shall issue a permit for an
installation:

(i) Upon satisfactory proof to the department
that the applicant has obtained a license for an
installation from the United States nuclear regulatory
commission and is otherwise in compliance with this
article;

(ii) That uses dry cask storage; and

(iii) That is temporary. The department shall
receive substantial assurances from the applicant that the
installation is temporary. For purposes of this paragraph,
substantial assurances shall include a license that is
time-limited from the United States nuclear regulatory
commission, a binding time frame for the movement of the
spent nuclear fuel to be stored from the installation to a
permanent repository or a binding commitment for delivery
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
of the spent nuclear fuel for reprocessing or to a
purchaser of spent nuclear fuel for reprocessing.

(d) Installations approved under this article are
exempt from the jurisdiction of the Industrial Development
Information and Siting Act.

(e) The operator of each installation shall send to
the department copies of all publicly available reports,
notifications and violations sent to or from the United
States nuclear regulatory commission or the operator of the
installation as soon as practicable but not later than five
(5) days after the operator sends or receives the report.
The operator shall also transmit all information required
under this subsection to emergency management departments
of the local governments where the installation is located
and shall make the information available on a public
website.

(f) Upon receipt of an application under this
article, the director shall, as soon as possible, apply for
any funds that may be available to the state from the
federal interim storage fund, the federal nuclear waste
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
fund and any other funds that are or may become available
to the state under any federal or state program. Nothing in
this subsection shall be construed to authorize the siting,
construction or operation of any installation not otherwise
authorized under this article.

(g) Any spent nuclear fuel in storage at an
installation shall remain the property of the advanced
nuclear reactor manufacturer until the spent nuclear fuel
is transferred to permanent storage or until the United
States or a federal agency takes title to the spent nuclear
fuel under the federal Nuclear Waste Policy Act or other
applicable federal law.

(h) If the owner of the spent nuclear fuel stored
under this article has not transferred the fuel to another
location, or if the United States or a federal agency has
not taken title to the spent nuclear fuel, the owner shall
be assessed additional fees established by rule of the
environmental quality council, provided that the fees shall
be in an amount sufficient to encourage the removal of the
spent nuclear fuel.

SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
(j) This article shall be construed to avoid
duplication and to avoid interference with any of the
requirements of the United States nuclear regulatory
commission. Nothing in this article shall be deemed to
affect the authority of the United States nuclear
regulatory commission.

Section 2. W.S. 35-11-103(a)(xiii), 35-11-1501(a)(i)
and (iii) and 35-11-1506(e)(i)(A) are amended to read:

35-11-103. Definitions.

(a) For the purpose of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(xiii) "This act" means W.S. 35-11-101 through
35-11-403, 35-11-405, 35-11-406, 35-11-408 through
35-11-1106, 35-11-1414 through 35-11-1432, 35-11-1601
through 35-11-1613, 35-11-1701, 35-11-1801 through
35-11-1803, 35-11-2001 through 35-11-2004, and 35-11-2101,
35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202.

35-11-1501. Definitions.
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "High-level radioactive waste" means as
defined in the "Nuclear Waste Policy Act of 1982" as
amended, 42 U.S.C. § 10101 et seq. "High-level radioactive
waste" does not include spent nuclear fuel that is stored
by an advanced nuclear reactor manufacturer under W.S.
35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202;

(iii) "High-level radioactive waste storage
facility" includes any facility for high-level radioactive
waste storage, other than a permanent repository operated
by a federal agency pursuant to the Nuclear Waste Policy
Act of 1982, as amended. "High-level radioactive waste
storage facility" includes an independent spent fuel
storage installation as defined in title 10 of the Code of
Federal Regulations part 72 section 3 and includes a
facility where an advanced nuclear reactor manufacturer as
defined by W.S. 35-11-2201(a)(i) stores other highly
radioactive material that the nuclear regulatory commission
determines is material that requires permanent isolation.
"High-level radioactive waste storage facility" shall not
SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
include a facility owned or operated by an advanced nuclear
reactor manufacturer for the storage of spent nuclear fuel
that is regulated under W.S. 35-11-2201 and 35-11-2202;

35-11-1506. Legislative approval of the siting of
high-level radioactive waste storage facilities;
conditions.

(e) The legislature hereby authorizes the siting of
temporary high-level radioactive waste storage facilities
within this state subject to the following:

(i) A facility is authorized if:

(A) It is operated on the site of and to
store the high-level radioactive waste or spent nuclear
fuel produced by a nuclear power generation facility
operating within the state or retrieved or accepted by an
advanced nuclear reactor manufacturer as defined by W.S.
35-11-2201(a)(i) for storage on the site of the
manufacturer;

SF0186

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0743
Section 3. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation from the department of environmental
quality, shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement
this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0186